Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,119
Notation on deed; required.

A permanent notation shall be made on the deed of any property where a solid waste disposal area or solid waste processing facility is sited. The notation shall indicate the name and address of the agency where records of operations of the area or facility are maintained and where copies of such records may be obtained.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 15.

For definitions, see section 13-1701.